Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-902
Sections; applicability; fiscal year.

Sections 23-901 to 23-919 shall apply to all the counties of this state, except counties having a population of two hundred thousand or more inhabitants, and shall apply to counties of the latter class to the extent and under the conditions presented in section 23-920. The fiscal year of all counties, except as is provided for in section 23-920, shall begin July 1 and end June 30, and shall be the budget year.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 2, p. 224;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2102;

R.S.1943, § 23-902;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 2, p. 212.